Indiana, session 2026, HB1100.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 31-9-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.191-2011,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. "Adoptive parent", for purposes of IC 31-19-11,
and IC 31-19-17 through IC 31-19-25.5, and IC 31-19-30, means an
adult who has become a parent of a child through adoption.
SECTION 2. IC 31-19-30 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 30. Health Insurance Coverage for Adoptive Children
Sec. 1. (a) Subject to any requirements under Title IV-E of the
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 673), if an adoptive child is eligible
for coverage:
(1) under the Medicaid program; and
(2) as a dependent under the adoptive parent's private health
insurance;
the adoptive parent may opt out of the adoptive child's
participation in the Medicaid program.
2026 IN 1100—LS 6212/DI 141


(b) To opt out of the adoptive child's participation in the
Medicaid program, the adoptive parent must file a request with the
department.
Sec. 2. Before approving an adoptive parent's request under
section 1 of this chapter, the department shall ensure that the
adoptive child:
(1) is eligible for coverage under the adoptive parent's private
health insurance; and
(2) will not experience a lapse in coverage while changing
from Medicaid to private health insurance.
Sec. 3. The department shall collaborate with the office of the
secretary of family and social services as necessary to administer
this chapter.
2026 IN 1100—LS 6212/DI 141